Utah statutes.
36-23-107.   Sunrise or sunset review -- Criteria.
(1)  In conducting a sunrise review, the committee may:
(a)  receive information from:
(i)  representatives of the occupation or profession proposed to be newly
regulated;
(ii)  the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing; or
(iii)  any other person;
(b)  review the proposal with or without considering proposed statutory
language;
(c)  evaluate the criteria in Subsection (2) to determine whether or not the
occupation or profession should be regulated by the state; and
(d)  as to the proposal, recommend:
(i)  that the proposal be adopted by the Legislature;
(ii)  that the proposal be adopted by the Legislature with recommended
changes;
(iii)  that the proposal not be adopted by the Legislature; or
(iv)  any other action.
(2)  When conducting a sunrise review or sunset review under this chapter, the
committee shall use the following criteria:
(a)  whether or not the unregulated practice of the occupation or profession
has clearly harmed or may harm or endanger the health, safety, or welfare of
the public;
(b)  whether or not the potential for harm or endangerment described in
Subsection (2)(a) is easily recognizable and not remote;
(c)  whether or not the public needs, and can reasonably be expected to
benefit from, an assurance of initial and continuing occupational or
professional competence;
(d)  whether or not regulation of the occupation or profession:
(i)  imposes significant new economic hardship on the public;
(ii)  significantly diminishes the supply of qualified practitioners; or
(iii)  otherwise creates barriers to service that are not consistent with the
public welfare or interest;
(e)  whether or not the occupation or profession requires knowledge, skills,
and abilities that are:
(i)  teachable; and
(ii)  testable;
(f)  whether or not the occupation or profession is clearly distinguishable
from other occupations or professions that are already regulated;
(g)  whether or not the occupation or profession has:
(i)  an established code of ethics;
(ii)  a voluntary certification program; or
(iii)  other measures to ensure a minimum quality of service;
(h)  whether or not:
(i)  the occupation or profession involves the treatment of an illness,
injury, or health care condition; and
(ii)  practitioners of the occupation or profession will request payment of
benefits for the treatment under an insurance contract subject to Section
31A-22-618;
(i)  whether or not the public can be adequately protected by means other than
regulation; and
(j)  other appropriate criteria as determined by the committee.
